Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-317
Restrictive covenant, defined.

Restrictive covenant shall mean any specification limiting the transfer, rental, or lease of any housing because of race, creed, religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, ancestry, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 18;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 12.